Utah statutes.
32A-12-204 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful sale or furnishing to intoxicated
persons.
(1)  A person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise furnish any alcoholic
beverage or product to:
(a)  any person who is actually or apparently intoxicated; or
(b)  a person whom the person furnishing the alcoholic beverage knew or should
have known from the circumstances was actually or apparently intoxicated.
(2) (a)  A person who negligently or recklessly violates Subsection (1) is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(b)  A person who knowingly violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
(3)  As used in Subsection (2)(a), "negligently" means with simple negligence.
